Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.180

Findings—Regional models—Grants.

The legislature finds that regional solutions to the state's transportation needs are of paramount concern. The legislature further recognizes that different areas of the state will need the flexibility to fashion local solutions to their transportation problems, and that regional transportation systems may evolve over time. Areas of the state outside of King, Snohomish, and Pierce counties are eligible for grants from the state of no more than two hundred thousand dollars each to study and develop regional transportation models. Regions receiving these grants shall:

(1) Develop a model that can be used within their region to select, fund, and administer regional transportation solutions;

(2) Adopt a county resolution approving the model proposed;

(3) Form interlocal agreements among counties as appropriate;

(4) Report to the transportation committees in the senate and house of representatives, petitioning the legislature to grant them authority to implement their proposed model.

[ 2002 c 56 s 118.]